Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.135

Telecommunication devices—Limits on possession—Policies.

School district boards of directors may adopt policies that limit the possession of (1) paging telecommunication devices by students that emit audible signals, vibrate, display a message, or otherwise summons or delivers a communication to the possessor, and (2) portable or cellular telephones.

[ 1997 c 266 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—1997 c 266: See notes following RCW 28A.600.455.